Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 2. Public Employment Relations Act.
Sec. 23.40.255.
Applicability to political subdivisions, including school districts.

AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

is applicable to organized boroughs and political subdivisions of the state, home rule or otherwise, unless the legislative body of the political subdivision, by ordinance or resolution, rejects having the provisions of AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

apply.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a municipal school district or regional educational attendance area may not reject application of AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

to employment relations with public school employees.

History.

(§ 4 ch 113 SLA 1972; am § 11 ch 1 SLA 1992)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was codified in 2008. Subsection (a) is derived from § 4, ch. 113, SLA 1972, and subsection (b) is derived from § 11, ch. 1, SLA 1992. There was also a temporary exception to subsection (a), similar to the exception in current subsection (b), created by § 1(c), ch. 180, SLA 1990.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

to employees of an authority established under AS

29.35.600

—

29.35.730

, see AS

29.35.685

.

For provision relating to the applicability of AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

to employees of an authority established under AS

29.35.800

—

29.35.925

, see AS

29.35.880

.

For provision relating to the applicability of AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

to employees of an authority established under AS

29.35.600

—

29.35.730

, see AS

29.35.685

.

Sec. 23.40.260.
Short title.

AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

may be cited as the Public Employment Relations Act.

History.

(§ 2 ch 113 SLA 1972)